apertium-cro.cro.lexc
! Morphological Transducer for Crow

Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>               ! Noun
%<v%>

%<prn%>             ! Pronoun
%<post%>            ! Postposition
%<spost%>           ! Separable postposition

%<aux%>

%<actv%>
%<stat%>

%<s_sg1%>
%<s_sg2%>
%<s_sp3%>
%<s_pl1%>
%<s_pl2%>


%<pl%>              ! Plural
%<sg%>              ! Singular

%>                  ! Morpheme boundary

@U.AGR.SG1@         ! Agreement 
@U.AGR.SG2@  
@U.AGR.SG3@
@U.AGR.PL1@
@U.AGR.PL2@
@U.AGR.PL3@


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root

Pronouns ; 
Postpositions ; 
Demonstratives ; 
Nouns ;
Verbs ;
Proper ; 

Prefixes ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON K 

# ; 

LEXICON MOOD  ! Table 16.1 [p.391]

%+k%<aux%>:»k # ; 
%+h%<aux%>:»h # ; 

LEXICON DEM

# ;

LEXICON V

# ;

LEXICON Prefixes


PREF-ACT-I ;
PREF-ACT-II ;
PREF-ACT-III ;
PREF-ACT-IV ;
PREF-ACT-IX ;
PREF-ACT-V ;
PREF-ACT-VI ;
PREF-ACT-VII ;
PREF-ACT-VIII ;
PREF-ACT-X ;
PREF-ACT-XI ;


PREF-STAT ;


LEXICON PREF-STAT ! Table 6.3 [p.124]

!------------------------------------------------!----------------------------------------------------!
! SINGULAR                                       ! PLURAL                                             !
!------------------------------------------------!----------------------------------------------------!
@U.AGR.SG1@%<s_sg1%>:@U.AGR.SG1@bii%>	STEMS-STAT ; 
@U.AGR.PL1@%<s_pl1%>:@U.AGR.PL1@balee%>	STEMS-STAT ;
@U.AGR.SG2@%<s_sg2%>:@U.AGR.SG2@dii%>	STEMS-STAT ; 
@U.AGR.PL2@%<s_pl1%>:@U.AGR.PL2@dii%>	STEMS-STAT ;
@U.AGR.SG3@%<s_sg3%>:@U.AGR.SG3@	STEMS-STAT ; 
@U.AGR.PL3@%<s_pl1%>:@U.AGR.PL3@balee%>	STEMS-STAT ;
!------------------------------------------------!----------------------------------------------------!

LEXICON PREF-ACT-I ! Table 6.8 [p.128]

!------------------------------------------------!--------------------------------------------------!
! SINGULAR                                       ! PLURAL                                           !
!------------------------------------------------!--------------------------------------------------!
@U.AGR.SG1@%<s_sg1%>:@U.AGR.SG1@bu%>   STEMS-V-I ; 
@U.AGR.PL1@%<s_pl1%>:@U.AGR.PL1@bu%>   STEMS-V-I ;
@U.AGR.SG2@%<s_sg2%>:@U.AGR.SG2@di%>   STEMS-V-I ; 
@U.AGR.PL2@%<s_pl2%>:@U.AGR.PL2@di%>   STEMS-V-I ;
@U.AGR.SG3@%<s_sg3%>:@U.AGR.SG3@       STEMS-V-I ; 
@U.AGR.PL3@%<s_pl3%>:@U.AGR.PL3@       STEMS-V-I ;
!------------------------------------------------!--------------------------------------------------!

LEXICON PREF-ACT-II ! Table 6.9 [p.128]

!------------------------------------------------!--------------------------------------------------!
! SINGULAR                                       ! PLURAL                                           !
!------------------------------------------------!--------------------------------------------------!
@U.AGR.SG1@%<s_sg1%>:@U.AGR.SG1@ba%>  STEMS-V-II ; 
@U.AGR.PL1@%<s_pl1%>:@U.AGR.PL1@ba%>  STEMS-V-II ;
@U.AGR.SG2@%<s_sg2%>:@U.AGR.SG2@da%>  STEMS-V-II ; 
@U.AGR.PL2@%<s_pl2%>:@U.AGR.PL2@da%>  STEMS-V-II ;
@U.AGR.SG3@%<s_sg3%>:@U.AGR.SG3@      STEMS-V-II ; 
@U.AGR.PL3@%<s_pl3%>:@U.AGR.PL3@      STEMS-V-II ;
!------------------------------------------------!--------------------------------------------------!

LEXICON PREF-ACT-III ! Table 6.10 [p.128]

!------------------------------------------------!--------------------------------------------------!
! SINGULAR                                       ! PLURAL                                           !
!------------------------------------------------!--------------------------------------------------!
@U.AGR.SG1@%<s_sg1%>:@U.AGR.SG1@b%>  STEMS-V-III ; 
@U.AGR.PL1@%<s_pl1%>:@U.AGR.PL1@b%>  STEMS-V-III ;
@U.AGR.SG2@%<s_sg2%>:@U.AGR.SG2@d%>  STEMS-V-III ; 
@U.AGR.PL2@%<s_pl2%>:@U.AGR.PL2@d%>  STEMS-V-III ;
@U.AGR.SG3@%<s_sg3%>:@U.AGR.SG3@     STEMS-V-III ; 
@U.AGR.PL3@%<s_pl3%>:@U.AGR.PL3@     STEMS-V-III ;
!------------------------------------------------!--------------------------------------------------!

LEXICON PREF-ACT-IV ! Table 6.11 [p.129]

!------------------------------------------------!--------------------------------------------------!
! SINGULAR                                       ! PLURAL                                           !
!------------------------------------------------!--------------------------------------------------!
@U.AGR.SG1@%<s_sg1%>:@U.AGR.SG1@ba%>  STEMS-V-IV ; 
@U.AGR.PL1@%<s_pl1%>:@U.AGR.PL1@ba%>  STEMS-V-IV ;
@U.AGR.SG2@%<s_sg2%>:@U.AGR.SG2@dá%>  STEMS-V-IV ; 
@U.AGR.PL2@%<s_pl2%>:@U.AGR.PL2@dá%>  STEMS-V-IV ;
@U.AGR.SG3@%<s_sg3%>:@U.AGR.SG3@      STEMS-V-IV ; 
@U.AGR.PL3@%<s_pl3%>:@U.AGR.PL3@      STEMS-V-IV ;
!------------------------------------------------!--------------------------------------------------!

LEXICON PREF-ACT-V ! Table 6.12 [p.130]

!------------------------------------------------!--------------------------------------------------!
! SINGULAR                                       ! PLURAL                                           !
!------------------------------------------------!--------------------------------------------------!
@U.AGR.SG1@%<s_sg1%>:@U.AGR.SG1@b%>    STEMS-V-V ; 
@U.AGR.PL1@%<s_pl1%>:@U.AGR.PL1@b%>    STEMS-V-V ;
@U.AGR.SG2@%<s_sg2%>:@U.AGR.SG2@d%>    STEMS-V-V ; 
@U.AGR.PL2@%<s_pl2%>:@U.AGR.PL2@d%>    STEMS-V-V ;
@U.AGR.SG3@%<s_sg3%>:@U.AGR.SG3@       STEMS-V-V ; 
@U.AGR.PL3@%<s_pl3%>:@U.AGR.PL3@       STEMS-V-V ;
!------------------------------------------------!--------------------------------------------------!

LEXICON PREF-ACT-VI ! Table 6.13 [p.130]

!------------------------------------------------!--------------------------------------------------!
! SINGULAR                                       ! PLURAL                                           !
!------------------------------------------------!--------------------------------------------------!
@U.AGR.SG1@%<s_sg1%>:@U.AGR.SG1@ba%>  STEMS-V-VI ; 
@U.AGR.PL1@%<s_pl1%>:@U.AGR.PL1@ba%>  STEMS-V-VI ;
@U.AGR.SG2@%<s_sg2%>:@U.AGR.SG2@dá%>  STEMS-V-VI ; 
@U.AGR.PL2@%<s_pl2%>:@U.AGR.PL2@dá%>  STEMS-V-VI ;
@U.AGR.SG3@%<s_sg3%>:@U.AGR.SG3@      STEMS-V-VI ; 
@U.AGR.PL3@%<s_pl3%>:@U.AGR.PL3@      STEMS-V-VI ;
!------------------------------------------------!--------------------------------------------------!

LEXICON PREF-ACT-VII ! Table 6.14 [p.131]

!------------------------------------------------!--------------------------------------------------!
! SINGULAR                                       ! PLURAL                                           !
!------------------------------------------------!--------------------------------------------------!
@U.AGR.SG1@%<s_sg1%>:@U.AGR.SG1@aw%> STEMS-V-VII ; 
@U.AGR.PL1@%<s_pl1%>:@U.AGR.PL1@aw%> STEMS-V-VII ;
@U.AGR.SG2@%<s_sg2%>:@U.AGR.SG2@al%> STEMS-V-VII ; 
@U.AGR.PL2@%<s_pl2%>:@U.AGR.PL2@al%> STEMS-V-VII ;
@U.AGR.SG3@%<s_sg3%>:@U.AGR.SG3@     STEMS-V-VII ; 
@U.AGR.PL3@%<s_pl3%>:@U.AGR.PL3@     STEMS-V-VII ;
!------------------------------------------------!--------------------------------------------------!

LEXICON Verbs
kalée:kalée V ; ! "vomit"
xapí:xapí V ; ! "lie down"
chipí:chipí V ; ! "drown"
áashua:áashua V ; ! "spit on"
áakalee:áakalee V ; ! "squirt on"
íaxapi:íaxapi V ; ! "cover oneself"
óhchipi:óhchipi V ; ! "dive into"
áachiahi:áachiahi V ; ! "confiscate"
áachiwi:áachiwi V ; ! "climb"
áakaapi:áakaapi V ; ! "reach summit"
áakaxpi:áakaxpi V ; ! "step over"
áapchi:áapchi V ; ! "kindle fire"
áapchiaxxu:áapchiaxxu V ; ! "sprinke"
áappasshi:áappasshi V ; ! "scramble for"
áatchiichi:áatchiichi V ; ! "peek"
áaxxinnee:áaxxinnee V ; ! "retain for oneself"
áchipee:áchipee V ; ! "be draped over"
ápaalia:ápaalia V ; ! "wrap around"
ápasshi:ápasshi V ; ! "touch together"
ápchichi:ápchichi V ; ! "touch with something harmful"
ápchishi:ápchishi V ; ! "rub on"
ássaa:ássaa V ; ! "be inside out (stative)"
ássasshi:ássasshi V ; ! "put on"
ássawua:ássawua V ; ! "step on"
áwiissaa:áwiissaa V ; ! "be suspended (stative)"
áxia:áxia V ; ! "stop intermittently"
áxpili:áxpili V ; ! "compete"
áxxalua:áxxalua V ; ! "stick in, tuck in"
áxxaxxi:áxxaxxi V ; ! "rub against"
áxxichi:áxxichi V ; ! "be sticking to (stative)"
ía:ía V ; ! "wear over the shoulders"
íaschili:íaschili V ; ! "buy"
íaxapi:íaxapi V ; ! "cover oneself"
íaxua:íaxua V ; ! "cover"
íaxxaaxii:íaxxaaxii V ; ! "stained, dirty"
íchisshi:íchisshi V ; ! "love"
íhchipshia:íhchipshia V ; ! "support, brace (stative)"
íhkashia:íhkashia V ; ! "mix with"
íhkasshi:íhkasshi V ; ! "live with, stay overnight with"
íhkukooxua:íhkukooxua V ; ! "cover, overwhelm"
íhee:íhee V ; ! "bet"
íhkuluu:íhkuluu V ; ! "be touching (stative, two-place)"
íihkupchi:íihkupchi V ; ! "splash water on rocks in sweat lodge"
íikaachi:íikaachi V ; ! "sit on"
íikuuwitaa:íikuuwitaa V ; ! "revolve"
íilutchiki:íilutchiki V ; ! "filled, plugged (stative)"
íipi:íipi V ; ! "have sex with"
íishi:íishi V ; ! "dip, get water in container"
íishia:íishia V ; ! "mixed (stative)"
íishuwi:íishuwi V ; ! "wash"
íiwaxpi:íiwaxpi V ; ! "set (sun) (stative)"
íkaa:íkaa V ; ! "see, look at"
íkaxxi:íkaxxi V ; ! "lean on"
íkoochi:íkoochi V ; ! "hang up on"
íkuchki:íkuchki V ; ! "plan"
íkuxxa:íkuxxa V ; ! "equal, equivalent"
ímmiili:ímmiili V ; ! "circle"
ísche:ísche V ; ! "plan well"
íssachi:íssachi V ; ! "plugged, covered over (stative)"
óhchipchi:óhchipchi V ; ! "stick up for"
óochia:óochia V ; ! "stop"
óoli:óoli V ; ! "wait for"
óolapi:óolapi V ; ! "find by accident, discover"
óoshii:óoshii V ; ! "dip out, scoop, ladle"
óotchi:óotchi V ; ! "steep (stative)"
óoxalia:óoxalia V ; ! "slide (on a sled)"
óoxalua:óoxalua V ; ! "steamed, vaporized (stative)"
dúxxaxxi:dúxxaxxi V ; ! "insert hand"
oóxxaxxi:oóxxaxxi V ; ! "shoot an arrow or bullet into a hole"
axeechí:axeechí V ; ! "break open"
dúuxeechi:dúuxeechi V ; ! "tear"
oóxeechi:oóxeechi V ; ! "pierce by shooting"
dáakoopi:dáakoopi V ; ! "break through with teeth"
dúukoopi:dúukoopi V ; ! "pierce"
achúutchua:achúutchua V ; ! "cut finely"
akbíili:akbíili V ; ! "cut according to pattern"
apíhpi:apíhpi V ; ! "cut into but not all the way through"
apúsa:apúsa V ; ! "cut through (skinning)"
attáa:attáa V ; ! " cut into strips"
axúshi:axúshi V ; ! "cut open, slice, cut through"
alachílee:alachílee V ; ! "push with the foot"
alachkú:alachkú V ; ! "limp"
alahchichí:alahchichí V ; ! "crush with foot"
alakoopí:alakoopí V ; ! "break through with foot"
alakuuwí:alakuuwí V ; ! "step in"
alapuuchí:alapuuchí V ; ! "walk fast"
alaschichí:alaschichí V ; ! "step on, press down with feet"
alashkapí:alashkapí V ; ! "step on"
alataxxí:alataxxí V ; ! "limp"
alattachí:alattachí V ; ! "break with foot"
alaxichí:alaxichí V ; ! "stop suddenly"
alá:alá V ; ! "be frostbitten" ! Ref/gra:94
aláchuuchi:aláchuuchi V ; ! "singed"
alákkua:alákkua V ; ! "smoked (meat)"
alátchii:alátchii V ; ! "scorched"
aláxchiia:aláxchiia V ; ! "browned over open fire"
aláxxu:aláxxu V ; ! "fried"
alóxxaxxi:alóxxaxxi V ; ! "feel hot"
dáachilee:dáachilee V ; ! "draw, attract toward"
dáakoopi:dáakoopi V ; ! "break through with teeth"
ishóocheen:ishíicheen V ; ! "in front of (stative)" ! Ref/gra:124
ihchisshí:ihchisshí V ; ! "rest"
ihk-alaaxtá:ihk-alaaxtá V ; ! "be surprised"
ihkammáachi:ihkammáachi V ; ! "celebrate"
ihkiaxshí:ihkiaxshí V ; ! "mispronounce a word"
dúupia:dúupia V ; ! "hate"
ihkulutchí:ihkulitchí V ; ! "dress up"
ihkuluxáa:ihkuluxáa V ; ! "relax"
dúupachi:dúupachi V ; ! "spread around"
dússhishi:dússhishi V ; ! "break"
dúuppi:dúuppi V ; ! "stretch"
dichí:dichí V ; ! "hit"
daas-átchuchi:daas-átchuchi V ; ! "be stoic, strong-hearted"
daás-dee:daás-dee V ; ! "be compassionate, kind"
daás-hawata:daás-hawata V ; ! "have a one-track mind"
íishpuu-xachii:íishpuu-xachii V ; ! "have an upset stomach"
úush-alee:úush-alee V ; ! "have the colic"
